Illinois, session 104th, SB1444.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Chicago Water Contracts Transparency Study Act. 6    Section 5. Purpose. The purpose of this Act is to direct 7the Commission on Government Forecasting and Accountability to 8commission a comprehensive study on the City of Chicago's 9water contracts with distributing municipalities. This study 10shall include detailed information on the agreements, charges, 11past infrastructure costs, future infrastructure costs, and 12fee increases and shall provide transparency concerning water 13distribution agreements within this State. The study shall 14also assess the potential cost impacts of establishing an 15alternative stream of water distribution, such as through the 16creation of a Southwest Water Authority or similar entity. 17    Section 10. Study commissioned. 18    (a) The Commission on Government Forecasting and 19Accountability shall commission an independent study to:20        (1) identify and catalog all existing water contracts 21    the City of Chicago has with municipalities that 22    distribute water from the City of Chicago's water supply;  SB1444- 2 -LRB104 08135 SPS 18181 b1        (2) articulate the amount of money charged by the City 2    of Chicago for the provision of water to these 3    distributing municipalities, including an analysis of any 4    pass-through contracts or agreements these municipalities 5    may have with other municipalities;6        (3) analyze historical trends in the charges and fee 7    increases associated with these water contracts, including 8    but not limited to:9            (A) the percentage increases in charges over the 10        previous 10 years;11            (B) the specific reasons for any fee increases; 12        and13            (C) an overview of how those increases have 14        impacted municipal budgets and water customers;15        (4) review past infrastructure costs related to water 16    treatment and distribution to these municipalities and 17    estimate future infrastructure costs needed to maintain or 18    improve water delivery systems, including projected costs 19    for upgrades, maintenance, and necessary capital 20    improvements;21        (5) provide recommendations for improving 22    transparency, accountability, and equitable pricing in the 23    future water contracts between the City of Chicago and 24    distributing municipalities; and25        (6) assess the potential cost impacts and benefits of 26    establishing an alternative stream of water distribution   SB1444- 3 -LRB104 08135 SPS 18181 b1    to the distributing municipalities, such as through the 2    creation of a Southwest Water Authority or similar entity.3    (b) The study shall include a detailed examination of the 4following:5        (1) Infrastructure and capital investment. The study 6    shall evaluate the initial capital investment required to 7    develop and construct an alternative water distribution 8    system, including the construction of treatment plants, 9    pipelines, reservoirs, and any necessary infrastructure to 10    support water delivery. The study shall also consider the 11    timeline for such development and the long-term 12    maintenance and operational needs.13        (2) Operational and maintenance costs. The study shall 14    analyze the annual operating costs associated with the 15    establishment and ongoing management of a new water 16    distribution entity, including staffing, energy, 17    maintenance, and administrative overhead. The study shall 18    also compare these costs to the current expenditures 19    related to water distribution through the City of Chicago, 20    including any hidden or indirect costs borne by 21    municipalities.22        (3) Impact on existing contracts. The study shall 23    examine how the introduction of a new water distribution 24    authority might affect the terms and financial obligations 25    of current water contracts between the City of Chicago and 26    municipalities. The study shall specifically assess   SB1444- 4 -LRB104 08135 SPS 18181 b1    whether municipalities could potentially reduce reliance 2    on the City of Chicago for water, renegotiate existing 3    contracts, or seek alternative supply sources, and how 4    this would affect the pricing structure and stability of 5    the current system.6        (4) Cost to municipalities and ratepayers. The study 7    shall project the potential cost impact on municipalities 8    and their residents if an alternative water distribution 9    system were implemented. The study shall also include 10    short-term and long-term price projections for water 11    rates, including any potential savings or increased costs 12    to municipalities and their customers and the financial 13    feasibility of transitioning to such a system.14        (5) Environmental and regulatory considerations. The 15    study shall assess any environmental impacts associated 16    with building a new water distribution system, including 17    water sourcing, treatment processes, and the 18    sustainability of the proposed alternative water supply. 19    The study shall include any considerations of compliance 20    with State and federal regulations and any potential 21    environmental challenges, such as water quality or access 22    issues.23        (6) Market competition and reliability. The study 24    shall analyze how the establishment of a Southwest Water 25    Authority or similar entity could introduce competition 26    into the water market, potentially benefiting   SB1444- 5 -LRB104 08135 SPS 18181 b1    municipalities by offering more competitive pricing and 2    reliable service options. The study shall also assess 3    whether the introduction of competition could lead to 4    innovation, greater efficiency, or better service quality.5        (7) Feasibility study of water sources. The study 6    shall evaluate alternative water sources available to the 7    proposed new authority, including the feasibility of 8    obtaining water from new sources, such as rivers, lakes, 9    or groundwater, that could be used to supply the new water 10    distribution entity. The study shall also consider the 11    potential risks and benefits of these sources compared to 12    the current reliance on the City of Chicago's water 13    supply.14        (8) Regional and statewide implications. The study 15    shall analyze the broader impact of establishing an 16    alternative water distribution system on regional and 17    statewide water management strategies. The study shall 18    also assess how the creation of an alternative authority 19    would influence overall water resource planning, 20    coordination among municipalities, and alignment with 21    State water management goals.22        (9) Potential for public-private partnerships. The 23    study shall explore the possibility of engaging 24    public-private partnerships to fund, build, and operate 25    the new water distribution system. The study shall also 26    evaluate the potential advantages and risks associated   SB1444- 6 -LRB104 08135 SPS 18181 b1    with such partnerships, including the potential for 2    greater efficiency, cost-sharing, and infrastructure 3    investment.4        (10) Municipal wells and local infrastructure. The 5    study shall examine the following:6            (A) State of infrastructure. The study shall 7        assess the condition of municipal wells used by 8        municipalities that do not solely rely on the City of 9        Chicago for water supply. The study shall include an 10        evaluation of existing well infrastructure, such as 11        pump systems, pipelines, storage tanks, treatment 12        facilities, maintenance needs, and associated costs 13        for repairs or upgrades.14            (B) Wells expiring and costs of replacement. The 15        study shall catalog the expiration or decommissioning 16        dates of wells in municipalities using wells as a 17        primary or supplementary water source, including the 18        age of the wells, expected lifespans, and projected 19        decommissioning timelines. The study shall also 20        evaluate the costs associated with replacing or 21        upgrading these wells, including drilling new wells, 22        expanding storage capacity, and upgrading treatment 23        systems to meet modern standards and regulatory 24        requirements.25            (C) Costs of infrastructure improvements. The 26        study shall examine the costs of necessary   SB1444- 7 -LRB104 08135 SPS 18181 b1        infrastructure improvements in municipalities with 2        aging or inadequate water infrastructure, including 3        system-wide assessments, repairs, expansions, or full 4        replacements. The study shall project the funding 5        required to bring the infrastructure up to code, 6        maintain system reliability, and ensure the 7        sustainability of local water supplies.8            (D) Impacts of wells on overall water cost. The 9        study shall consider the financial impacts on 10        municipalities' water costs, including any savings or 11        increases that could result from relying on well water 12        versus purchasing water from the City of Chicago or an 13        alternative distribution authority. The study shall 14        include energy costs, maintenance of infrastructure, 15        and the long-term sustainability of groundwater 16        resources in making this consideration. 17    Section 15. Public hearings. The Commission on Government 18Forecasting and Accountability shall hold at least 2 public 19hearings to solicit input from municipal representatives, 20water industry experts, and other stakeholders and include any 21relevant information resulting from those hearings in the 22study. 23    Section 20. Reporting requirements. The Commission on 24Government Forecasting and Accountability shall complete the   SB1444- 8 -LRB104 08135 SPS 18181 b1study and submit a report that includes an executive summary, 2detailed findings, and any recommendations resulting from the 3study to the General Assembly and the Governor no later than 4one year after the effective date of this Act. 5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 6becoming law.